Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5838YC (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.146, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 3 establishing additional endorsements for instruction related 4 to all of the following high-need teaching areas in schools 5 providing instruction to students enrolled in prekindergarten 6 through grade twelve: 7 (1) Fine arts. 8 (2) Mathematics. 9 (3) Science. 10 (4) Agriculture. 11 b. The board shall not grant an applicant an endorsement 12 described in paragraph âaâ unless the applicant holds a 13 bachelorâs degree from an accredited college or university. 14 c. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2030. 15